Maine, session 132, LD448.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §18309 is enacted to read:
§18309. Fees
1. Fee establishment. The director may establish by rule fees for purposes authorized
under this chapter in amounts that are reasonable and necessary for their respective
purposes, except that:
A. The fee for any one purpose may not exceed $550 unless another fee is authorized
by paragraph B or C;
Page 1 - 132LR0631(03)

B. The fee for an initial license or a license renewal under section 18342 or a permit
under section 18379 may not exceed $1,000; and
C. The fee for an initial license or a license renewal under section 18345 may not
exceed $200.
2. Rules. Rules adopted pursuant to subsection 1 are routine technical rules pursuant
to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to June 29, 2023.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0631(03)